Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB62.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 383.200 TO 383.285 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "extreme weather conditions" means a:
(a) Day for which the National Weather Service has issued either an Extreme
Cold Warning or Extreme Heat Warning for the county in which the court
is located; or
(b) Period of natural disaster in the county in which the court is located. As
used in this paragraph, "natural disaster" means any natural disaster
resulting in the declaration of a state of emergency under KRS 39A.100 or
39B.070.
(2) The court shall stay the execution of a warrant of restitution of a residential
property, from day to day, during extreme weather conditions.
(3) When a stay has been issued under subsection (2) of this section, the execution of
the warrant of restitution for which the stay has been issued shall be given
priority and completed within three (3) days after the extreme weather conditions
cease.
Section 2. KRS 383.245 is amended to read as follows:
If the party against whom the inquisition is found fails to file an appeal of the inquisition
with the court, on or before the seventh day after the finding of the inquest, the court
shall, on request, issue execution for the costs; and, if the inquisition be in favor of the
plaintiff, it shall also, subject to Section 1 of this Act, issue a warrant of restitution in
substance as follows: ".... County. To the sheriff (or any constable) of .... county,
Whereas, C D and E F have been found guilty of a forcible entry in (or detainer of) one
house and field, lying on the waters of ...., in the county aforesaid (or other general
description of the possessions), to the injury of A B: You are, therefore, in the name of
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/9/2026 11:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1710
the Commonwealth of Kentucky, commanded that, with the power of the county if
necessary, you put the said A B in the possession of said premises; and make return
within .... days, how you have executed this warrant. Given under my hand this .... day of
....
............................................District Judge"
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/9/2026 11:44 AM Jacketed